Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2406
Act, how construed.

Nothing in the Prompt Payment Act shall be construed to prohibit full or partial payments by agencies for goods or services whether or not such goods or services have been completely received or finally accepted by the agencies.

Laws 1988, LB 1079, § 6.